Maine, session 132, LD2137.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §1500-LL, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Exemption. A municipality that has adopted an ordinance that regulates any
parking rule applicable to property owned by the municipality and accessible to the public
for the parking of motor vehicles and that includes fines, fees or charges for a violation of
the ordinance is exempt from the requirements of subsection 1.
Page 1 - 132LR2938(08)